fi: Neulanpitimen ominaisuudet: Kantokahva; Kirkas/läpinäkyvä ikkuna; Ripustuslenkki; Kovakuorinen suojaus; Yksittäiset lokerot; Nimetyt lokerot; Lukitusmekanismi; Langanpujottimen säilytys; Suojakorkki/-kansi; Pehmeä pehmustettu vuori; Vedenhylkivä; Muu
sk-SK: Funkcie držiaka ihly: Rukoväť na prenášanie; Číre/priehľadné okienko; Závesné pútko; Ochrana s tvrdým obalom; Jednotlivé priehradky; Označené priehradky; Uzamykací mechanizmus; Úložný priestor na navliekač ihiel; Ochranný kryt/uzáver; Mäkká polstrovaná podšívka; Vodoodolné; Iné
ro-RO: Caracteristicile suportului pentru ace: Mâner de transport; Fereastră clară/transparentă; Buclă de suspendare; Protecție carcasă dură; Fante individuale; Fante etichetate; Mecanism de blocare; Spațiu de depozitare pentru dispozitivul de înfilat; Capac/husă de protecție; Căptușeală moale matlasată; Rezistent la apă; Altele
tr: İğne tutucu özellikleri: Taşıma sapı; Saydam/şeffaf pencere; Asma halkası; Sert kapaklı koruma; Ayrı yuvalar; Etiketli yuvalar; Kilitleme mekanizması; İğneye iplik geçirme aparatı saklama alanı; Koruyucu kapak/kılıf; Yumuşak dolgulu astar; Suya dayanıklı; Diğer
ja: 針ホルダー機能: キャリーハンドル; クリア/透明ウィンドウ; ハンギングループ; ハードシェルプロテクション; 個別スロット; ラベル付きスロット; ロック機構; 糸通し用収納; 保護キャップ/カバー; ソフトパッドライニング; 耐水性; その他
es: Características del portaagujas: Asa de transporte; Ventana clara/transparente; Bucle para colgar; Protección rígida; Ranuras individuales; Ranuras etiquetadas; Mecanismo de bloqueo; Almacenamiento para enhebrador; Tapa o cubierta protectora; Forro suave y acolchado; Resistente al agua; Otro
it: Caratteristiche del portaaghi: Maniglia di trasporto; Finestra trasparente; Anello per appendere; Protezione rigida; Alloggiamenti singoli; Alloggiamenti etichettati; Meccanismo di blocco; Vano per infila aghi; Cappuccio/copertura di protezione; Fodera morbida imbottita; Resistente all'acqua; Altro
pt-PT: Características do porta-agulhas: Pega de transporte; Janela transparente; Presilha de suspensão; Proteção de revestimento rígido; Ranhuras individuais; Ranhuras identificadas; Mecanismo de bloqueio; Armazenamento de enfiador de agulhas; Tampa/capa protetora; Forro macio almofadado; Resistente à água; Outro
sv: Nålhållarens egenskaper: Bärhandtag; Genomskinligt fönster; Upphängningsögla; Hårdskalsskydd; Individuella fack; Märkta fack; Låsmekanism; Förvaring för nålpåträdare; Skyddskåpa/hölje; Mjukt vadderat foder; Vattentålig; Övrigt
bg-BG: Характеристики на държача за игли: Дръжка за носене; Прозрачен прозорец; Халка за окачване; Защита с твърда обвивка; Индивидуални отделения; Отделения с етикети; Заключващ механизъм; Място за вдевачка; Предпазна капачка/покривало; Мека подплатена подплата; Водоустойчив; Друго
de: Merkmale des Nadelhalters: Tragegriff; Klares/transparentes Fenster; Aufhängeschlaufe; Hartschalenschutz; Einzelne Fächer; Beschriftete Fächer; Verschlussmechanismus; Aufbewahrung für Nadeleinfädler; Schutzkappe/-abdeckung; Weich gepolstertes Innenfutter; Wasserabweisend; Sonstiges
en: Needle holder features: Carrying handle; Clear/transparent window; Hanging loop; Hard-shell protection; Individual slots; Labeled slots; Locking mechanism; Needle threader storage; Protective cap/cover; Soft padded lining; Water resistant; Other
fr: Caractéristiques du porte-aiguilles: Poignée de transport; Fenêtre transparente; Boucle de suspension; Protection à coque rigide; Fentes individuelles; Fentes étiquetées; Mécanisme de verrouillage; Rangement pour enfile-aiguille; Bouchon/couvercle de protection; Doublure douce et rembourrée; Résistant à l’eau; Autre
nb: Egenskaper for nåleholder: Bærehåndtak; Klart/gjennomsiktig vindu; Opphengsløkke; Beskyttelse i hardt skall; Individuelle spor; Merkede spor; Låsemekanisme; Oppbevaring av nålitreder; Beskyttelseshette/-deksel; Mykt polstret fôr; Vannavstøtende; Annet
da: Funktioner for nåleholder: Bærehåndtag; Gennemsigtigt vindue; Ophængningsløkke; Hard shell-beskyttelse; Individuelle rum; Rum med mærkater; Låsemekanisme; Opbevaring til nåletråder; Beskyttelseshætte/-cover; Blødt polstret for; Vandafvisende; Andet
el: Χαρακτηριστικά θήκης βελόνας: Λαβή μεταφοράς; Διάφανο παράθυρο; Θηλιά ανάρτησης; Σκληρό περίβλημα προστασίας; Ανεξάρτητες υποδοχές; Υποδοχές με ετικέτα; Μηχανισμός κλειδώματος; Χώρος αποθήκευσης περαστή κλωστής; Προστατευτικό καπάκι/κάλυμμα; Μαλακή επένδυση; Ανθεκτικό στο νερό; Άλλο
cs: Vlastnosti držáku jehly: Ucho na přenášení; Čiré/průhledné okénko; Poutko na zavěšení; Ochrana pevnou skořepinou; Samostatné přihrádky; Označené přihrádky; Zamykací mechanismus; Úložný prostor na navlékač jehel; Ochranné víčko / kryt; Měkká polstrovaná podšívka; Voděodolné; Ostatní
pt-BR: Suporte para agulhas recursos: Alça de transporte; Janela transparente; Alça para pendurar; Proteção rígida; Espaços individuais; Espaços etiquetados; Mecanismo de travamento; Armazenamento para passador de linha; Tampa/capa protetora; Forro acolchoado macio; Resistente à água; Outro
ru: Особенности держателя для игл: Ручка для переноски; Прозрачное окно; Петля для подвешивания; Жесткий корпус; Отдельные ячейки; Слоты с маркировкой; Механизм блокировки; Отделение для нитковдевателя; Защитный колпачок/крышка; Мягкая подкладка; Водостойкий; Другое
ko: 바늘꽂이 특징: 운반용 핸들; 투명 창; 행잉 루프; 하드쉘 보호; 개별 슬롯; 라벨 슬롯; 잠금 장치; 실 끼우개 보관함; 보호 캡/커버; 소프트 패딩 안감; 방수; 기타
zh-TW: 持針器特色: 便攜提把; 透明視窗; 掛環; 硬殼保護; 獨立插槽; 標籤插槽; 鎖定機制; 穿線器收納空間; 保護蓋/罩; 柔軟襯墊內裡; 防潑水; 其他
pl: Cechy uchwytu na igły: Uchwyt do przenoszenia; Przezroczyste okienko; Pętelka do zawieszania; Twarda obudowa ochronna; Oddzielne przegródki; Oznaczone przegródki; Mechanizm blokujący; Miejsce na nawlekacz do igieł; Ochronna nasadka/osłona; Miękka wyściółka; Wodoodporność; Inne
sl-SI: Značilnosti držala za igle: Ročaj za prenašanje; Prozorno okno; Zanka za obešanje; Trdna zunanja zaščita; Posamezne reže; Označene reže; Zaklepni mehanizem; Shranjevanje za vdevalec sukanca; Zaščitni pokrovček/pokrov; Mehka oblazinjena podloga; Vodoodporno; Drugo
vi: Đặc điểm của giá đỡ kim: Tay xách; Cửa sổ trong/trong suốt; Vòng treo; Bảo vệ vỏ cứng; Khe đựng riêng biệt; Khe đựng có nhãn; Cơ chế khóa; Khay chứa dụng cụ xỏ kim; Nắp/vỏ bảo vệ; Lớp lót đệm mềm; Chống thấm nước; Khác
hr-HR: Značajke držača igle: Ručka za nošenje; Prozirni prozorčić; Omča za vješanje; Čvrsta zaštita (hard-shell); Pojedinačni utori; Označeni utori; Mehanizam za zaključavanje; Spremište za uvlakač konca; Zaštitna kapica / poklopac; Meka podstavljena obloga; Vodootporno; Ostalo
th: คุณสมบัติของที่จับเข็ม: หูหิ้ว; หน้าต่างโปร่งใส; ห่วงแขวน; การป้องกันด้วยเคสแข็ง; ช่องแยกเดี่ยว; ช่องติดป้ายกำกับ; กลไกการล็อก; ที่เก็บที่สนเข็ม; ฝา/ที่ครอบป้องกัน; ซับในบุนุ่ม; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
hu: Tűtartó jellemzői: Hordozófogantyú; Átlátszó ablak; Akasztófül; Keményhéjas védelem; Különálló rekeszek; Feliratozott rekeszek; Zárszerkezet; Tűbefűző tároló; Védőkupak/-burkolat; Puha párnázott bélés; Vízálló; Egyéb
lt-LT: Adatų laikiklio funkcijos: Nešimo rankena; Skaidrus permatomas langelis; Pakabinimo kilpa; Kieto korpuso apsauga; Atskiri skyreliai; Paženklinti skyreliai; Užrakinimo mechanizmas; Vieta siūlo įvėrėjui; Apsauginis dangtelis / apdangalas; Minkštas paminkštintas pamušalas; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
zh-CN: 针筒功能: 提手; 透明视窗; 挂环; 硬壳保护; 独立插槽; 标签插槽; 锁定机制; 穿线器收纳; 保护帽/盖; 柔软防震内衬; 防水; 其他
nl: Naaldenhouder kenmerken: Handvat; Helder/transparant venster; Ophanglus; Harde buitenkant; Aparte vakjes; Gemarkeerde vakjes; Vergrendelingsmechanisme; Opbergruimte voor draaddoorsteker; Beschermkap/-hoes; Zachte, gewatteerde voering; Waterbestendig; Anders